Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 3. LEGISLATIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE B. LEGISLATION

CHAPTER 319. LEGISLATION REGARDING JUDICIAL SYSTEM

Sec. 319.021. IMPACT STATEMENT ON LEGISLATION IMPOSING COURT COSTS ON CRIMINAL DEFENDANTS. (a) This section applies only to a new court cost or fee that is remitted to the comptroller.

(b) The Legislative Budget Board shall prepare an impact statement for each resolution proposing a constitutional amendment or bill that proposes imposing a new court cost or fee on a person charged with a criminal offense or increasing the amount of an existing court cost or fee imposed on a person charged with a criminal offense, including a court cost or fee imposed on conviction or other disposition or postponed disposition of the criminal charge.

(c) The impact statement must show the total amount of court costs and fees that persons will be required to pay under the bill or resolution when considered together with all other applicable laws.

(d) The state auditor shall provide the Legislative Budget Board with the initial data needed to develop a mechanism that will be used to produce the impact statements.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 209, Sec. 84, eff. Oct. 1, 2003.